epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/sv.xml
		å2lin
		ål3k
		åll4sp
		ål2s5e
		ål3st
		å1lä
		å1m
		åman4s
		ånd4r
		ån4du
		åns4t
		åns4v
		å3o
		å1p
		å2pl
		å5pla
		å4pö
		år4do
		ård4ra
		ård2s
		ård4s3t
		å4rel
		å1ri
		å5ror
		5årsav
		år5s2li
		år2sv
		år5ö
		ås4ke
		ås3n
		åss4
		ås4skr
		ås4t
		åte2
		åt3ri
		å3trå
		åt2sj
		ått5s
		å1v
		ä1a
		ä2b
		2äc
		äck5v
		ä2d
		ädd3s
		äd4du
		äde4s
		äd3r
		äd5se
		äd3st
		ä3e
		ä1ga
		ä1ge
		äg4go
		äg1l
		äg3r
		äg4re
		äg3se
		ä3i
		ä5jo
		4äk
		ä1ki
		äk3n
		äk3r
		ä1la
		äl4pap
		äl4seg
		äls5kog
		äl4slu
		äl2t3r
		äl2tu
		äl4vin
		ämp3l
		4ändligh
		änd3r
		änd1st
		äng5r
		änni3s
		änn3s
		ä4no
		äns1l
		än4st
		äns5te
		än4sv
		än2t3r
		ä3pe
		äpp3l
		ä4pr
		äp4st
		ä4rap
		är2bre
		ärg5l
		är4gr
		ä1ri
		ärib4
		är4kä
		är4nis
		ärn3st
		är2nå
		är4nö
		är5ob
		ä5rol
		ä3rop
		ä5ror
		ä5ros
		är2si
		är4sko
		är2so
		är4sp
		är2sv
		är4tand
		är2tr
		ärt3s
		4äs
		äs3pa
		äs5pi
		äs4sk
		äs4sp
		äs3ta
		äst3r
		ä4stä
		ä4så
		2ät
		ä3to
		ä5tre
		ät4s3k
		ät5te
		ät4top
		ätt3r
		ät4tu
		ät4tv
		ä1va
		ä2vak
		ä3vi
		ä5vu
		ö1a
		ö2d
		ö4dak
		ö4dal
		ö4darv
		öde4s5
		ö4dis
		öd3ra
		öd2s
		öd3se
		ö4du
		ö4dö
		ö1e
		ö1ga
		ög5ak
		ö5gar
		1ögd
		ö1ge
		ö5ger
		ögg4
		ög1l
		ög2n
		ögn3e
		1ögo
		ög3si
		ög3sk
		ö1i
		ö3jo
		öj4sv
		ö4karm
		ö1ki
		ök3n
		ök2s
		ök3sl
		ö1la
		öl4kv
		öl4kö
		öl2p
		ö5lä
		öman4
		öm2kl
		ö4nal
		ö2nom
		öns3ke
		ön4so
		önst3r
		ö3pe
		ö4pel
		ö3pi
		öp5li
		ö5plo
		1öppn
		ö4pr
		ö3rande
		ö3ras
		ö4rask
		örb4
		ör3d4r
		ör1eni
		ö3res
		ö4restr
		ö3ret
		ör5evig
		ör3g
		ö1ri
		ö5rig
		ö3ring
		ör3int
		ör5ir
		ör5iv
		ör4kal
		ör1k2l
		ör5kli
		ör4nis
		ör3ol
		ör1or
		ör2p5la
		ör1s2k
		ör3sl
		ör4slä
		ör5te
		ört5s
		ör1u
		ör3vr
		ör3y
		ör1ä
		örö4d
		ö2sak
		ös3n
		ös4sj
		ös2sk
		ös4sp
		ös3ta
		öst3v
		ö2tak
		öts5ko
		öt4st
		ö1v
		öve4
		över1
		5övere
		ö2vj
		öv3ra
		öv3ri
		öv4sk
		é3e
	</patterns>

</hyphenation-info>
